New York, session 2025-2026, S9479.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 25-0103 of the 2 environmental conservation law, as added by chapter 790 of the laws of 3 1973, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) those areas which border on or lie beneath tidal waters of the 5 marine and coastal district, as described in section 13-0103 of this 6 chapter, such as, but not limited to, banks, bogs, salt marsh, swamps, 7 meadows, flats or other low lands subject to tidal action, including 8 those areas now or formerly connected to tidal waters; 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15249-04-6